Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.250

Interference with entry or work of district—Penalty.

Any person who obstructs, hinders, or interferes with the entry upon any land within the district of any officer or employee of the district in the performance of his or her duty, and any person who obstructs, interferes with, molests, or damages any work performed by the district, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 467; 1957 c 153 s 25.]